Alaska statutes. Title 19. Highways and Ferries.
Article 1. Department of Transportation and Public Facilities.

Sec. 19.05.010.
Department to supervise highway system.

The department is responsible for the planning, construction, maintenance, protection, and control of the state highway system.

History.

(§ 1 art III title I ch 152 SLA 1957)

Cross references. —

See note to AS

19.05.030

.

Administrative Code. —

For memorial sign program, see 17 AAC 8.

For maintenance, see 17 AAC 20.

For commercial motor vehicles: size and weight, see 17 AAC 25, art. 1.

For commercial motor vehicles: safety and hazardous materials, see 17 AAC 25, art. 2.

For oversize and overweight vehicles, see 17 AAC 25, art. 3.

For waivers, see 17 AAC 25, art. 4.

For toll highways, see 17 AAC 35.

For Anton Anderson memorial tunnel, see 17 AAC 38.

For tourist-oriented directional signs, see 17 AAC 60, art. 1.

For logo signs, see 17 AAC 60, art. 2.

For recreational and cultural interest area signs, see 17 AAC 60, art. 3.

For tourist information kiosks, see 17 AAC 60, art. 5.

Opinions of attorney general. —

Although there is no specific grant of authority to the Department of Transportation and Public Facilities to transfer highways to a municipality, the power to effectuate such a transfer may be considered as implicit through the operation of AS

19.05.040

,

19.05.060

,

19.05.070

,

19.10.020

and this section. January 1, 1987 Op. Att’y Gen.

The Department of Transportation and Public Facilities can manage and operate a vessel maintenance facility under the authority of AS

44.42.020(a)(1)

and (a)(7) and this section. July 1, 1985 Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 19.05.020.
Regulations.

The department shall adopt regulations necessary to carry out the purpose of AS 19.05 — AS 19.25.
The regulations may not conflict with AS 36.30 (State Procurement Code) or regulations adopted by the Department of Administration to implement that chapter.

History.

(§ 1 art III title I ch 152 SLA 1957; am § 10 ch 106 SLA 1986)

Administrative Code. —

For administration, see 17 AAC 5.

For memorial sign program, see 17 AAC 8.

For encroachment permits, see 17 AAC 10, art. 1.

For driveway and approach road permits, see 17 AAC 10, art. 2.

For land disposal, see 17 AAC 10, art. 3.

For utility permits, see 17 AAC 15, art. 1.

For utility standards and requirements, see 17 AAC 15, art. 2.

For utility relocation and installation, see 17 AAC 15, art. 3.

For railroads, see 17 AAC 15, art. 4.

For maintenance, see 17 AAC 20.

For commercial motor vehicles: size and weight, see 17 AAC 25, art. 1.

For commercial motor vehicles: safety and hazardous materials, see 17 AAC 25, art. 2.

For oversize and overweight vehicles, see 17 AAC 25, art. 3.

For waivers, see 17 AAC 25, art. 4.

For buses, see 17 AAC 28.

For toll highways, see 17 AAC 35.

For Anton Anderson memorial tunnel, see 17 AAC 38.

For tourist-oriented directional signs, see 17 AAC 60, art. 1.

For logo signs, see 17 AAC 60, art. 2.

For recreational and cultural interest area signs, see 17 AAC 60, art. 3.

For tourist information kiosks, see 17 AAC 60, art. 5.

For marine highway system procurement procedures, see 17 AAC 70, art. 3.

For appeals, see 17 AAC 85.

Opinions of attorney general. —

A policy of publishing regulations concerning bidding and letting of contracts in the Administrative Code is consistent with the Alaska Administrative Procedure Act (AS

44.62.010

—

44.62.950

), since these regulations are regulations in which an important portion of the public has a vital interest and since they are of great use to the portion of the public interested in dealing and contracting with the state. 1959 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 27.

Sec. 19.05.030.
Duties of department.

The department has the following duties:

direct approved highway planning and construction and maintenance, protection, and control of highways;

employ assistants and employees;

certify and approve vouchers;

provide a program of highway research;

prepare a budget;

review the annual highway program;

develop and implement an avalanche control plan to protect persons who use public highways;

review and respond to recommendations regarding the statewide transportation improvement program that are made by the Alaska Marine Highway Operations Board established under AS

19.65.110

;

report, in a manner that is easily available to the public and the media, including on the department’s Internet website, on the progress of the Alaska marine highway system in meeting the performance goals established by the Alaska Marine Highway Operations Board under AS

19.65.011

.

History.

(§ 2 art IV title I ch 152 SLA 1957; am § 2 ch 119 SLA 1980; am § 1 ch 20 SLA 2021)

Cross references. —

For participation in statewide avalanche warning system, see AS

18.76.010

.

Administrative Code. —

For administration, see 17 AAC 5.

For Anton Anderson memorial tunnel, see 17 AAC 38.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2021 amendment, effective October 11, 2021, added (8) and (9), and made a related change.

Sec. 19.05.040.
Powers of department.

The department may

acquire property;

exercise the power of eminent domain;

take immediate possession of real property, or any interest in real property under a declaration of taking or by other lawful means;

acquire rights-of-way for present or future use;

control access to highways;

regulate roadside development;

preserve and maintain the scenic beauty along state highways;

dispose of property acquired for highway purposes;

accept and dispose of federal funds or property available for highway construction, maintenance, or equipment;

enter into contracts or agreements relating to highways with the federal government, municipalities, a political subdivision, or with a foreign government, if the contract is approved by the federal government;

establish, levy, and collect tolls, fees, charges, and rentals for the use of state roads, highways, bridges, tunnels, crossings, and causeways;

award and administer grants authorized by appropriation by the legislature; and

exercise any other power necessary to carry out the purpose of AS 19.05 — AS 19.25.

History.

(§ 2 art III title I ch 152 SLA 1957; am § 3 ch 35 SLA 1971; am § 2 ch 162 SLA 1984; am § 1 ch 165 SLA 1988; am E.O. No. 101 § 2 (2000); am § 1 ch 39 SLA 2005)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2008, paragraph (12) was renumbered as (13) and paragraph (13) was renumbered as (12).

Administrative Code. —

For administration, see 17 AAC 5.

For memorial sign program, see 17 AAC 8.

For driveway and approach road permits, see 17 AAC 10, art. 2.

For utility permits, see 17 AAC 15, art. 1.

For utility standards and requirements, see 17 AAC 15, art. 2.

For utility relocation and installation, see 17 AAC 15, art. 3.

For railroads, see 17 AAC 15, art. 4.

For maintenance, see 17 AAC 20.

For commercial motor vehicles: size and weight, see 17 AAC 25, art. 1.

For commercial motor vehicles: safety and hazardous materials, see 17 AAC 25, art. 2.

For oversize and overweight vehicles, see 17 AAC 25, art. 3.

For waivers, see 17 AAC 25, art. 4.

For buses, see 17 AAC 28.

For toll highways, see 17 AAC 35.

For Anton Anderson memorial tunnel, see 17 AAC 38.

For tourist-oriented directional signs, see 17 AAC 60, art. 1.

For logo signs, see 17 AAC 60, art. 2.

For recreational and cultural interest area signs, see 17 AAC 60, art. 3.

For tourist information kiosks, see 17 AAC 60, art. 5.

Legislative history reports. —

For report on ch. 35, SLA 1971 (HB 387), see 1971 House Journal, p. 776.

Opinions of attorney general. —

The Department of Transportation and Public Facilities possesses the authority to lease for operation a vessel maintenance facility it manages, by virtue of AS

44.42.020(a)(6)

and this section. July 1, 1985 Op. Att’y Gen.

Although there is no specific grant of authority to the Department of Transportation and Public Facilities to transfer highways to a municipality, the power to effectuate such a transfer may be considered as implicit through the operation of AS

19.05.010

,

19.05.060

,

19.05.070

,

19.10.020

and this section. January 1, 1987 Op. Att’y Gen.

It is within the power of the Department of Transportation and Public Facilities under paragraph (11) to charge a toll for use of the James Dalton Highway. February 20, 1987 Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 19.05.043.
Child safety device loan program.

There is established a child safety device loan program in the highway safety planning agency in the Department of Transportation and Public Facilities.

The director of the highway safety planning agency shall design the child safety device loan program to work in conjunction with private and federal programs operating in the state and shall

provide to every hospital and birthing center in the state, subject to the availability of funds, child safety devices for infants and children to be loaned to the public at nominal fees;

disseminate materials, printed advertisements, and radio and television messages to educate the public about the risks of injury to and death of unrestrained infants and children in motor vehicles and to explain to the public the provisions of AS

28.05.095

.

A peace officer who stops a driver for an alleged violation of AS

28.05.095

shall inform the driver about the loan program.

History.

(E.O. No. 101 § 3 (2000))

Sec. 19.05.045.
Relocation payments.
[Repealed,
§ 2 ch 60 SLA 1969.]

Sec. 19.05.046.
Accounting and disposition of receipts from nonstate entities. [Repealed, § 28 ch 90 SLA 1991.]

Sec. 19.05.050.
Roads in tourist and trailer camps.

The department may adopt regulations governing the use of roads in tourist, trailer, and other camps when public and private roads in or through the camps are used by, or are open to, the general public.

History.

(§ 1 ch 59 SLA 1955)

Sec. 19.05.060.
Sale of obsolete equipment and material.

The department may sell, exchange, or otherwise dispose of obsolete machinery, equipment, and material no longer needed, required, or useful for construction or maintenance purposes. Money derived from the sale of the property shall be credited to the funds from which the purchase was originally made.

History.

(§ 3 art IV title IV ch 152 SLA 1957)

Administrative Code. —

For maintenance, see 17 AAC 20.

For buses, see 17 AAC 28.

Opinions of attorney general. —

Although there is no specific grant of authority to the Department of Transportation and Public Facilities to transfer highways to a municipality, the power to effectuate such a transfer may be considered as implicit through the operation of AS

19.05.010

,

19.05.040

,

19.05.070

,

19.10.020

and this section. January 1, 1987 Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 19.05.070.
Vacating and disposing of land and rights in land.

The department may vacate land, or part of it, or rights in land acquired for highway purposes, by executing and filing a deed in the appropriate recording district. Upon filing, title to the vacated land or interest in land inures to the owners of the adjacent real property in the manner and proportion considered equitable by the commissioner and set out in the deed.

If the department determines that land or rights in land acquired by the department are no longer necessary for highway purposes the department may

transfer the land or rights in land to the Department of Natural Resources for disposal; or

sell, contract to sell, lease, or exchange land or rights in land according to terms, standards, and conditions established by the commissioner.

Proceeds received from disposal of land or rights in land as authorized by this section shall be credited to the funds from which the purchase of the land was made originally.

History.

(§ 4 art IV title IV ch 152 SLA 1957; am § 4 ch 35 SLA 1971)

Administrative Code. —

For encroachment permits, see 17 AAC 10, art. 1.

For land disposal, see 17 AAC 10, art. 3.

Opinions of attorney general. —

Although there is no specific grant of authority to the Department of Transportation and Public Facilities to transfer highways to a municipality, the power to effectuate such a transfer may be considered as implicit through the operation of AS

19.05.010

,

19.05.040

,

19.05.060

,

19.10.020

and this section. January 1, 1987 Op. Att’y Gen.